Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5445.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 43-4-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 43-4 entitled "Effect of
General Laws" is hereby amended to read as follows:
43-4-18. Enactment of supplemental reenactments by the law revision director.
(a) The office of law revision of the joint committee on legislative services is authorized to
annually reenact specific titles of the general laws which shall be amendatory to the general laws
of Rhode Island, 1956, as amended, for the purposes specified in § 22-11-3.4. Substantive changes
contained in the reenactment of these titles shall be annually brought to the attention of the general
assembly in a “Statutes and Statutory Construction” bill, prepared by the law revision office, for
general assembly approval or disapproval. The office of law revision shall also identify, on a yearly
basis, any United States Supreme Court decisions or rulings that would require amendments to any
state statutes or general laws, and shall so inform each chamber of those decisions or rulings.
(b) The reenacted sections of the general laws shall be construed as continuations of
previously enacted public laws and all rights and remedies remain in effect as defined in this
chapter.
(c) In case of any conflict between an act passed at an annual or special session of the
general assembly and an amendment adopted as a part of a reenactment or the “Statutes and
Statutory Construction” bill referred to in subsection (a) of this section, the former shall be
controlling regardless of respective dates of passage or approval.

(d) The provisions in titles that have been amended and corrected as “reenactments” shall
take effect and go into operation on and after December 31 of the calendar year of their reenactment.
(e) The enactment of this section and the repeal of sections in chapter 4 of title 43 adopted
prior to the date of enactment of this chapter of the public laws shall not act as a repeal of those
chapters of the public laws which have been adopted to reenact the general laws.
(f) Any subsequent reenactments shall be recorded in the history of this section.
(g) In any reenactment, the word “text” as used in the general laws does not include: (1)
printer’s reference lines appearing at the top or bottom of any galley proof; (2) title or chapter
heading (except the numbers of said titles and chapters); (3) tables of contents appearing at the
beginning of the titles and chapters; or (4) boldface captions appearing at the beginning of sections
(except the numbers of said sections), except insofar as the title or chapter headings or boldface
captions are necessary for clarification of any statutory text.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001285
========
LC001285 - Page 2 of 3